North Dakota statutes. TITLE 24 Highways, Bridges, And Ferries
CHAPTER 24-12 Miscellaneous Provisions

24-12-01.
Injuries to highways.

No person may willfully dig up, remove, displace, break, or otherwise injure or destroy any public highway, right of way, or bridge, or any rest area, picnic area, or tourist camp, or improvements thereon, operated in connection with a public highway, or any private way laid out by authority of law, or any bridge upon such way without first securing permission from the person or governing body having jurisdiction and control thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 115; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-1201; S.L. 1959, ch. 236, § 1.

Cross-References.

Damaging property or public services, see N.D.C.C. ch. 12.1-21.

24-12-02.
Obstructing highways.

No person may:

Obstruct any public highway in any manner with intent to prevent the free use thereof by the public;

Willfully and knowingly obstruct or plow up, or cause to be obstructed or plowed up, any public highway or right of way, except by order of the officials having jurisdiction over such highway for the purpose of working or improving the same;

Build or place a barbed wire fence across any well-traveled trail which has been the usual and common route of travel for not less than one year without placing on the outside of the top tier of barbed wire on said fence a board, pole, or other suitable protection, to be at least sixteen feet [4.88 meters] in length; or

Plow up a section line in a manner so as to obstruct usual travel on the section line.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 116; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-1202; S.L. 1967, ch. 211, § 1; 1987, ch. 322, § 1.

Section Line.

This section was not applicable to a fence and gate built by property owner on a section line where, under section 24-07-03, the section line was not considered a public road and it was not a well-traveled trail. De Lair v. County of La Moure, 326 N.W.2d 55, 1982 N.D. LEXIS 333 (N.D. 1982).

Section applied to section lines. State v. Silseth, 399 N.W.2d 868, 1987 N.D. LEXIS 246 (N.D. 1987).

A section line is a “public highway or right of way” under this section. State v. Silseth, 399 N.W.2d 868, 1987 N.D. LEXIS 246 (N.D. 1987).

This section unambiguously proscribes plowing of a section line, irrespective of whether or to what degree that action obstructs the section line. State v. Silseth, 399 N.W.2d 868, 1987 N.D. LEXIS 246 (N.D. 1987).

By enacting this section, the legislature has declared that plowing a section line constitutes interference with the public’s easement for travel. State v. Silseth, 399 N.W.2d 868, 1987 N.D. LEXIS 246 (N.D. 1987).

Farmer is not required to request permission from township board before plowing unimproved, though traveled, section line. State v. Brossart, 1997 ND 119, 565 N.W.2d 752, 1997 N.D. LEXIS 123 (N.D. 1997).

Subsection (4) does not limit a township board’s authority over a traveled section line by allowing it to be plowed without permission when that activity does not obstruct usual travel. State v. Brossart, 1997 ND 119, 565 N.W.2d 752, 1997 N.D. LEXIS 123 (N.D. 1997).

Subsection (4) is intended to permit plowing of unimproved and traveled section lines if it does not “obstruct usual travel,” while continuing the prohibition against plowing along improved public highways. State v. Brossart, 1997 ND 119, 565 N.W.2d 752, 1997 N.D. LEXIS 123 (N.D. 1997).

Isolated crossing and drainage culvert did not improve section line enough to impose the restrictions against plowing in subsection (2). State v. Brossart, 1997 ND 119, 565 N.W.2d 752, 1997 N.D. LEXIS 123 (N.D. 1997).

Collateral References.

Pole: liability of governmental unit for injury to traveler from collision with privately owned pole standing within highway boundaries, 3 A.L.R.2d 6.

Liability of governmental unit for collision with safety and traffic-control devices in traveled way, 7 A.L.R.2d 226.

Trees: liability of municipality for damage caused by fall of tree or limb, 14 A.L.R.2d 186.

Holiday, entertainment, parade, or other special event, liability of municipality for injury or death resulting from temporary condition or obstruction in street in connection with, 84 A.L.R.2d 508.

Governmental liability for failure to reduce vegetation obscuring view at railroad crossing or at street or highway intersection, 22 A.L.R.4th 624.

Liability of private landowner for vegetation obscuring view at highway or street intersection, 69 A.L.R.4th 1092.

24-12-03.
Garbage deposited on highways. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 277, § 21.

24-12-04.
Injury to mileboards, guideposts, traffic-control signals, signs, or markings.

No person may remove, injure, or destroy any mileboard, milestone, or guidepost, traffic-control signals, signs, or markings, or any inscription thereon, erected or placed upon any highway, road, or street by any public authority or by any contractor, subcontractor, or employee engaged in construction activities pursuant to a contract with a public authority therefor.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 118; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-1204; S.L. 1961, ch. 204, §§ 2, 3; 1979, ch. 327, § 2.

24-12-04.1.
Rewards authorized.

The director or any political subdivision of this state is hereby authorized to offer a reward, the amount of which must be determined by the director or the governing body of the political subdivision not exceeding, however, the sum of three hundred dollars, for any information leading to the conviction of any person or persons violating the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 327, § 3.

24-12-05.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this title for which another penalty is not specifically prescribed is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 119; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-1205; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 264.

24-12-06.
Penalty for running tollgate. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.